Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-513. Disqualification — Voluntarily leaving work — Definitions.

If so found by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, an individual shall be disqualified for benefits if he or she voluntarily and without good cause connected with the work left his or her last work.

An individual working as a temporary employee will be deemed to have voluntarily quit employment and will be disqualified for benefits under this subsection if upon conclusion of his or her latest assignment, the temporary employee without good cause failed to contact the temporary help firm for reassignment, provided that the employer advised the temporary employee at the time of hire that he or she must report for reassignment upon conclusion of each assignment and that unemployment benefits may be denied for failure to do so.

As used in this subsection, “temporary help firm” means a firm that hires its own employees and assigns them to clients to support or supplement the client's workforce in work situations such as employees' absences, temporary skill shortages, seasonal workloads, and special assignments and projects.

The term does not include employee leasing companies regulated under § 11-10-717(e).

“Temporary employee” means an employee assigned to work for the clients of a temporary help firm.

Any person who leaves his or her last work to comply with the order of a correctional institution or to satisfy the terms of his or her parole or probation shall be deemed to have left work “voluntarily and without good cause connected with the work”.

The disqualification shall continue until, subsequent to the effective date of the disqualification, he or she has had at least thirty (30) days of employment covered by an unemployment compensation law of this state, another state, or the United States.

No individual shall be disqualified under this section if after making reasonable efforts to preserve his or her job rights he or she left his or her last work:

Due to a personal emergency of such nature and compelling urgency that it would be contrary to good conscience to impose a disqualification;

Because of illness, injury, pregnancy, or disability of the individual or a member of the individual's immediate family.

As used in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, “immediate family member” means a spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, or grandparent of the individual;

Due to domestic violence that causes the individual reasonably to believe that the individual's continued employment will jeopardize the safety of the individual or a member of the individual's immediate family.

As used in subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section, “immediate family member” means a spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, or grandparent of the individual; or

To accompany the individual's spouse because of a change in the location of the spouse's employment that makes it impractical to commute.

No individual shall be disqualified under this section if he or she left his or her last work because he or she voluntarily participated in a permanent reduction in the employer's workforce after the employer announced a pending reduction in its workforce and asked for volunteers.

Such actions initiated by the employer shall be considered layoffs regardless of any incentives offered by the employer to induce its employees to volunteer.

Any incentives received shall be reported under § 11-10-517.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 5; 1947, No. 398, § 4; 1949, No. 155, § 5; 1953, No. 162, § 3; 1955, No. 395, §§ 9, 10; 1963, No. 93, § 6; 1967, No. 248, § 1; 1977, No. 366, § 6; 1979, No. 492, § 7; 1979, No. 922, § 7; 1983, No. 482, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1106; Acts 1997, No. 234, § 12; 2003, No. 1223, § 5; 2005, No. 902, § 2; 2007, No. 490, § 5; 2009, No. 802, § 4; 2019, No. 453, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 241.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 453 substituted “the effective date of the disqualification” for “filing a claim” in (a)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 453, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019.

Part-time Employment.

A claimant who voluntarily leaves part-time employment is ineligible for further unemployment benefits only to the extent that his benefits would have been decreased by his part-time wages. Hopkins v. Stiles, 10 Ark. App. 77, 662 S.W.2d 177 (1983), rev'd, 282 Ark. 207, 666 S.W.2d 703 (1984).

Where it appeared from the record that had claimant continued her part-time employment, her part-time wages were too small to have any effect on unemployment benefits which she was already receiving, claimant was entitled to unemployment benefits even though she voluntarily left part-time job without good cause. Hopkins v. Stiles, 10 Ark. App. 77, 662 S.W.2d 177 (1983), rev'd, 282 Ark. 207, 666 S.W.2d 703 (1984).

An employee who was laid off from a full-time job after ten years, subsequently obtained a part-time job with an employment agency, and later quit the part-time job was entitled to unemployment benefits based upon the full-time job subject only to partial reduction by the amount of her part-time wages. Stiles v. Coit, 285 Ark. 212, 686 S.W.2d 405 (Ark. 1985).

11-10-514. Disqualification — Discharge for misconduct.

If so found by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, an individual shall be disqualified for benefits if he or she is discharged from his or her last work for misconduct in connection with the work.

In cases of discharge for absenteeism, the individual shall be disqualified for misconduct in connection with the work if the discharge was pursuant to the terms of a bona fide written attendance policy, regardless of whether the policy is a fault or no-fault policy.

Misconduct in connection with the work includes the violation of any behavioral policies of the employer as distinguished from deficiencies in meeting production standards or accomplishing job duties; and

Without limitation:

Disregard of an established bona fide written rule known to the employee; or

A willful disregard of the employer’s interest.

Misconduct in connection with the work shall not be found for instances of poor performance unless the employer can prove that the poor performance was intentional.

An individual's repeated act of commission, omission, or negligence despite progressive discipline constitutes sufficient proof of intentional poor performance.

An individual who refuses an alternate suitable job rather than being terminated for poor performance shall be considered discharged for misconduct in connection with the work.

The disqualification under subsection (a) of this section shall continue until, subsequent to the effective date of the disqualification, the individual has had at least thirty (30) days of employment covered by an unemployment compensation law of this state, another state, or the United States.

If an individual is discharged from his or her last work for misconduct in connection with the work on account of dishonesty, drinking on the job, reporting for work while under the influence of intoxicants, including a controlled substance, or willful violation of bona fide written rules or customs of the employer including those pertaining to his or her safety or the safety of fellow employees, persons, or company property, harassment, unprofessional conduct, or insubordination, he or she shall be disqualified until, subsequent to the date of the disqualification, the individual has been paid wages in two (2) quarters for insured work totaling not less than thirty-five (35) times his or her weekly benefit amount.

If an individual is discharged for testing positive for an illegal drug pursuant to a United States Department of Transportation-qualified drug screen conducted in accordance with the employer's bona fide written drug policy, the individual is disqualified until, subsequent to the date of the disqualification, the claimant has been paid wages in two (2) quarters for insured work totaling not less than thirty-five (35) times his or her weekly benefit amount.

Any weekly benefits payable subsequent to the date of the disqualification under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be terminated.

The termination shall apply only to benefits payable within the benefit year of the claim with respect to which the claimant is disqualified for testing positive for an illegal drug under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.

If an individual is disqualified under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, a benefit paid to the individual with respect to any week of unemployment after the discharge shall not be charged to the account of the employer that discharged the individual if the benefit is based upon wages paid to the individual for employment before the discharge by the employer that discharged the individual.

If so found by the director, an individual shall be disqualified for benefits if he or she is suspended from his or her last work for misconduct in connection with the work.

Except as otherwise provided, the disqualification shall be for the duration of the suspension or eight (8) weeks, whichever is the lesser.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 5; 1943, No. 138, § 30; 1947, No. 398, § 4; 1949, No. 155, § 5; 1953, No. 162, § 3; 1955, No. 395, §§ 11, 12; 1971, No. 35, § 9; 1983, No. 482, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1106; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 14; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 95, § 1; 1993, No. 6, § 7; 1999, No. 1116, § 11; 2001, No. 770, § 1; 2007, No. 454, § 1; 2009, No. 802, § 5; 2011, No. 861, § 4; 2011, No. 1040, § 2; 2013, No. 956, § 1; 2013, No. 1077, §§ 1-3; 2015, No. 690, § 1; 2019, No. 453, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §
242.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by No. 861 rewrote (a)(2), (a)(3), (b)(1), and (b)(2)(A); and added (d).

The 2011 amendment by No. 1040 substituted “on or after July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2012” for “during the period of July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011” in (a)(3)(B).

The 2013 amendment by No. 956 rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1077 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendment deleted the (b)(2)(A)(i) designation; deleted (b)(2)(A)(ii); inserted (b)(2)(B); and redesignated former (b)(2)(B) as (b)(2)(C).

The 2019 amendment by No. 453 substituted “the effective date of the disqualification” for “filing a claim” in (a)(5).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 453, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019.

11-10-515. Disqualification — Failure or refusal to apply for or accept suitable work.

If so found by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, an individual shall be disqualified for benefits if he or she has failed without good cause:

To apply for available suitable work when so directed by a Division of Workforce Services office; or

To accept available suitable work when offered.

The disqualification under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall continue until, subsequent to the effective date of the disqualification, he or she has had at least thirty (30) days of employment covered by an unemployment compensation law of this state, another state, or the United States.

An individual who applies for benefits is disqualified for benefits if he or she was rejected for offered employment as the direct result of a failure:

To appear for a United States Department of Transportation-qualified drug screen after having received a bona fide job offer of suitable work subject to passage of the drug screen; or

To pass a United States Department of Transportation-qualified drug screen by testing positive for an illegal drug after having received a bona fide job offer of suitable work.

The disqualification under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall continue until subsequent to the date of the disqualification, the claimant has been paid wages in two (2) quarters for insured work totaling not less than thirty-five (35) times his or her weekly benefit amount.

No individual shall be disqualified from the receipt of benefits with respect to any week in which he or she is in training with the approval of the director by reason of the application of provisions in subsection (a) of this section.

For the purpose of this subsection, the approval of the director shall be based on the following considerations:

The claimant's skills must be either obsolete or the demands for his or her skills in his or her labor market must be such as to make employment opportunities for him or her in that labor market minimal and not likely to improve;

The claimant must possess aptitudes or skills which can be usefully supplemented within a short time by retraining;

The training must be for an occupation for which there is a substantial and recurring demand; and

The claimant must produce evidence of continued attendance and satisfactory progress.

In determining whether or not any work is suitable for an individual and in determining the existence of good cause for voluntarily leaving his or her work under § 11-10-513, there shall be considered, among other factors and in addition to those enumerated in subsection (d) of this section, the degree of risk involved to his or her health, safety, and morals, his or her physical fitness and prior training, his or her experience and prior earnings, the length of his or her unemployment, his or her prospects for obtaining work in his or her customary occupation, the distance of available work from his or her residence, and prospects for obtaining local work.

Work offered to an individual by a base-period or last employer at earnings equal to or greater than the individual earned from the base-period or last employer shall be deemed to be suitable work unless any of the factors above are applicable and it would be contrary to good conscience to deem the work suitable.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no work shall be deemed suitable and benefits shall not be denied under this chapter to any otherwise eligible individual for refusing to accept new work under any of the following conditions:

If the position offered is vacant due to a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute;

If the wages, hours, or other conditions of the work offered are substantially less favorable to the individual than those prevailing for similar work in the locality; or

If as a condition of being employed, the individual would be required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 5; 1943, No. 138, § 30; 1949, No. 155, § 5; 1955, No. 395, § 13; 1971, No. 35, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1106; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 28; 1997, No. 234, § 13; 2001, No. 755, § 1; 2007, No. 454, § 2; 2011, No. 861, § 5; 2015, No. 690, § 2; 2019, No. 453, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 243.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (a)(1)(B); deleted “after July 31, 2007” following “applies for benefits” in (a)(2)(A); and added (a)(2)(B)(i).

The 2015 amendment deleted the (a)(2)(B)(i) designation; and deleted (a)(2)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 453, in (a)(1)(B), substituted “the effective date of the disqualification” for “filing a claim”, and deleted “and shall begin with the week in which the failure to apply for or accept available suitable work occurred” from the end.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the introductory language of (a)(1)(A); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1)(A)(i).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 453, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019.

11-10-516. Disqualification — Refusal to report after layoff.

If so found by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, an individual shall be disqualified for benefits if while on a layoff of ten (10) weeks or less, he or she refuses to report for work within one (1) week after notice of recall to the same job or to a suitable job similar to the one from which he or she was laid off, or if while unemployed, he or she voluntarily removes his or her name from a recall list set forth in a written contract of a base-period employer, provided that the employer files a written notice of the refusal of recall or removal from a recall list with the Division of Workforce Services within seven (7) days of the occurrence.

The disqualification shall begin on the date of receipt of the written notice of refusal of recall or removal from the recall list by the division and shall continue until, subsequent to filing his or her claim, he or she has had at least thirty (30) days of employment covered by an unemployment compensation law of this state, or another state, or of the United States.

No individual shall be disqualified under this section if he or she refuses to report for recall to the job or removes his or her name from a recall list as described in subsection (a) of this section because he or she is employed on a full-time basis, has a written offer of a job, or because of circumstances of such nature and compelling urgency that it would be contrary to good conscience to impose a disqualification.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 5; 1955, No. 395, § 14; 1983, No. 482, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1106; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 15; 2005, No. 902, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 244.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” twice in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(2).

11-10-517. Disqualification — Receipt of other remunerations.

If so found by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, an individual shall be disqualified for benefits for any week with respect to which he or she receives or has received remuneration in the form of:

Separation Payments.

For initial claims made on and after January 1, 2018:

Separation payments are disqualifying for the number of weeks following the date of the separation that equals the number of weeks of wages received in the separation payment.

An armed services severance payment paid to a former member of the United States Armed Forces shall not be disqualifying under the terms of this section.

Remuneration paid as back pay in settlement of a claim or grievance and supplemental unemployment benefits shall not be disqualifying; and

The employer shall specify the total amount of separation pay and the number of weeks of wages represented by the separation pay.

If the employer does not specify the number of weeks under subdivision (1)(A)(ii)(a) of this section, the Division of Workforce Services shall allocate the separation pay using the claimant's average weekly wage.

For the purposes of subdivision (1)(A) of this section, a partial week of separation pay shall be treated as a payment for a full week of separation;

Unemployment benefits under an unemployment compensation law of another state or of the United States;

Any governmental or other pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or any other similar periodic payment received with respect to the week and that is based on the previous work of the claimant if payment is received under a plan maintained or contributed to by a base-period employer.

However, the amount of unemployment benefits payable to the individual for the week shall be reduced, but not below zero ($0.00), by an amount equal to the amount of the pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or other payment that is reasonably attributable to the week.

Any weekly benefit amount that is reduced because of the receipt of remuneration as defined under this section and that is not an even multiple of one dollar ($1.00) shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1.00).

If payments referred to in this subdivision (3) are being received by any individual under the federal Social Security Act, the director shall take into account the individual's contribution and make no reduction in the weekly benefit amount;

Training and retraining allowance provided for by appropriation of the United States Congress.

However, this subdivision (4) does not apply if the claimant has met the benefit eligibility conditions set out in §§ 11-10-507 — 11-10-511 and other sections of this chapter;

Vacation Payments.

Vacation payments shall be treated as earnings in accordance with § 11-10-503 with respect to the week or weeks in which the vacation period occurred.

For the purpose of this subdivision (5), the employer shall promptly report the week or weeks involved in the vacation period as well as the corresponding amount of vacation pay with respect to such week or weeks.

Any vacation payments received due to a permanent separation from employment shall not be disqualifying nor deductible under this section;

Bonus payments that shall be treated as earnings in accordance with § 11-10-503 only for the week in which the payment is received;

Sick Payments.

Sick payments shall be treated as earnings in accordance with § 11-10-503 with respect to the week or weeks in which the sick-pay period occurred.

For the purpose of this subdivision (7), the employer shall promptly report the week or weeks involved in the sick-pay period as well as the corresponding amount of sick payments with respect to the week or weeks.

However, any sick payments received due to a permanent separation from employment shall not be disqualifying nor deductible under this section; and

Holiday Payments.

Holiday payments shall be treated as earnings in accordance with § 11-10-503 for the week or weeks in which the holiday occurred.

For the purpose of this subdivision (8), the employer shall promptly report the week or weeks involved in the holiday pay period and the corresponding amount of holiday payments for that holiday pay period.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, §§ 3, 5; 1949, No. 155, § 5; 1953, No. 162, § 3; 1955, No. 395, § 16; 1963, No. 93, §§ 4, 6; 1971, No. 35, §§ 7, 9; 1972
(1st Ex. Sess.), No. 65, § 1; 1975, No. 154, § 1; 1975, No. 609, § 2; 1975, No. 627, § 1; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, §§ 6, 7; 1977, No. 366, § 7; 1977, No. 376, § 11; 1979, No. 492, § 8; 1979, No. 922, § 8; 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 8; 1983, No. 482, §§ 9, 18-20; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1104, 81-1106; reen. Acts 1987, No. 672, §§ 5, 6; Acts 1991, No. 48, § 4; 1993, No. 6, § 8; 2001, No. 1367, § 6; 2003, No. 1223, § 6; 2005, No. 902, § 4; 2007, No. 490, § 6; 2017, No. 734, § 4; 2019, No. 453, § 7; 2019, No. 910, §§ 245, 246.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 672, §§ 5, 6. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Acts 2017, No. 734, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The State of Arkansas needs to take steps to ensure the financial stability of the Unemployment Compensation Fund;

“(2)

Arkansas's unemployment costs to employers are higher than some surrounding states;

“(3)

Arkansas employers have been paying increased unemployment taxes since 2009 as a result of a recession which dramatically increased unemployment; and

“(4)

Making the changes set forth in this bill will increase the stability of the Unemployment Compensation Fund and increase the state's employers' ability to compete in attracting businesses.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (1)(A)-(C) as (1)(A); and added (1)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 453 deleted former (1)(A) and redesignated former (1)(B) as (1)(A); added (1)(B); and updated an internal reference in (1)(A)(ii)

(b)

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the introductory language of the section; and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (1)(B)(ii)

(b)

[now (1)(A)(ii)

(b)

U.S. Code.

The Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 453, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019.

11-10-518. Disqualification — Certain workers in training program excepted.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an adversely affected worker covered by a certification under Subchapter A, Chapter 2, Title II of the Trade Act of 1974 may not be determined to be ineligible or disqualified for unemployment insurance or Trade Act benefits payable under Part I, Subchapter B, Chapter 2, Title II of the Trade Act of 1974 because the individual is in training approved under Part II, Subchapter B, Chapter 2, Title II of the Trade Act of 1974 because of:

Leaving work which is not suitable employment to begin or continue training; or

The application to any such week in training of provisions of this chapter or any state or federal unemployment insurance law relating to availability for work, active search for work, or refusal to accept work.

For purposes of this section, the term “suitable employment” means, with respect to a worker described in this section, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the worker's past adversely affected employment and wages for such work at not less than eighty percent (80%) of the worker's average weekly wage.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 5; 1943, No. 138, § 30; 1947, No. 398, § 4; 1949, No. 155, § 5; 1953, No. 162, § 3; 1955, No. 395, §§ 17, 18; 1963, No. 93, § 6; 1977, No. 376, § 11; 1979, No. 492, § 9; 1979, No. 922, § 9; 1981, No. 43, §§ 6, 7; 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1106; 2005, No. 902, § 5.

U.S. Code.

Title II, Chapter 2, of the Trade Act of 1974 referred to in this section is codified as 19 U.S.C. § 2271 et seq.

11-10-519. Disqualification — Penalty for false statement or misrepresentation.

If so found by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, an individual shall be disqualified for benefits:

If he or she willfully makes a false statement or misrepresentation of a material fact or willfully fails to disclose a material fact in filing an initial claim or a claim renewal, he or she shall be disqualified from the effective date of the disqualification until he or she has twenty (20) weeks of employment in each of which he or she has earned wages equal to at least his or her weekly benefit amount.

In addition to the twenty-week disqualification in subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, any weekly benefits payable subsequent to the date of delivery or mailing of the determination shall be terminated.

The termination shall apply only to benefits payable within the benefit year of the claim with respect to which the claimant willfully made a false statement or misrepresentation;

For any continued week claimed with respect to which the employee has willfully made a false statement or misrepresentation of a material fact or willfully fails to disclose a material fact in obtaining or attempting to obtain any benefits, and for an additional thirteen (13) weeks of unemployment, as defined in § 11-10-512, and which shall commence with Sunday of the first week with respect to which a claim is filed commencing with the week of delivery or mailing of the determination of disqualification under this section.

In addition to the thirteen (13) weeks of disqualification, a disqualification of three (3) weeks shall be imposed for each week of failure or falsification.

Any weekly benefits payable subsequent to the date of delivery or mailing of the determination shall be terminated.

The termination shall apply only to benefits payable within the benefit year of the claim with respect to which the claimant willfully made a false statement or misrepresentation; and

The disqualification shall not be applied after five (5) years have elapsed from the date of delivery or mailing of the determination of disqualification under this section.

A person who is disqualified under this section shall be liable for repayment of any benefits determined to have been collected fraudulently, as well as any other penalties, interest, and costs assessed as a result of the fraudulent activity.

Until the liabilities have been repaid, the person shall forfeit any right to receive benefits under this chapter.

Upon request of the Legislative Council, the Division of Workforce Services shall provide reports regarding unemployment insurance claim fraud and its efforts to prevent the fraud.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 5; 1949, No. 155, § 5; 1955, No. 395, § 19; 1963, No. 93, § 6; 1971, No. 35, § 9; 1983, No. 482, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1106; Acts 2001, No. 1367, § 7; 2003, No. 1223, § 7; 2013, No. 1242, § 1; 2019, No. 453, § 8; 2019, No. 910, §§ 247, 248.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “claim renewal, he or she shall” for “claim renewal.
He or she shall” in (a)(1); redesignated former (2)(B) as present (a)(2)(B)(i) and (a)(2)(B)(ii); in (a)(2)(B)(ii)(

a

), inserted “of” following “mailing” and substituted “terminated” for “reduced fifty percent (50%) rounded to the next lower dollar, and the remainder of maximum benefits shall be reduced accordingly”; substituted “termination” for “reduction” in (a)(2)(B)(ii)(

b

); in (a)(3), substituted “two and one half (2½)” for “five (5)” and inserted “of” following “mailing”; and added (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 453 redesignated (a)(1) as (a)(1)(A); in (a)(1)(A), substituted “effective date of the disqualification” for “date of filing the claim” and substituted “twenty (20) weeks” for “ten (10) weeks”; added (a)(1)(B); redesignated (a)(3) as (a)(3)(A); in (a)(3)(A), substituted “five (5) years” for “two and one-half (2½) years”, and deleted “but all overpayments established by the determination of disqualification shall be collected as otherwise provided by this chapter” from the end; and added (a)(3)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (b).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 453, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019.

11-10-520. Claims — Posting of information by employer.

Each employer shall post and maintain, in places readily accessible to individuals in the employer's employ, printed statements concerning benefit rights, claims for benefits, and such other matters relating to the administration of this chapter as the Director of the Division of Workforce Services may by rule prescribe.

Each employer shall supply to those individuals copies of such printed statements or other materials relating to claims for benefits when, and as, the director may by rule prescribe.

The printed statements and other materials shall be supplied by the director to each employer without cost to the employer.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 821; 2019, No. 910, §
249.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a) and (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-521. Claims — Filing — Notice to last employer.

Claims for benefits shall be made in accordance with rules the Director of the Division of Workforce Services prescribes.

A notice of the filing of an initial claim shall be immediately mailed or posted online under subsection (c) of this section, or both, to the employing unit known to the claimant as his or her last employer.

An employer notified under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section may choose to receive and respond to notice under this section through the mail or through the online program under subsection (c) of this section, or both.

If a last employer fails to respond within ten (10) calendar days to a notice under this section, the last employer shall be deemed to have waived the right to respond.

If a last employer's right to respond has been deemed waived under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, the director may accept the statement given by the claimant as his or her reason for separation from the last employer and may base his or her determination on the statement given by the claimant.

On or before January 1, 2012, the director shall make available on the website of the Division of Workforce Services a program that will allow employers the option to receive and respond to notice under this section.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1953, No. 162, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 2011, No. 1229, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 822; 2019, No. 910, §§
250, 251.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “Department of Workforce Services” for “Arkansas Employment Security Department” in (a); in (b)(1)(A), deleted “In accordance with such regulations as the director may prescribe” at the beginning and inserted “or posted online under subsection (c) of this section, or both”; and added “(b)(1)(B), (b)(2), and (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (c).

11-10-522. Claims — Determination.

In General.

A monetary determination upon a claim filed pursuant to § 11-10-521(a) shall be made promptly by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services and shall include total wage credits as reported paid by each employer during the claimant's base period and the identity of each base-period employer.

For a claimant who meets the wage requirements of § 11-10-507(5), this notice shall include the beginning date of his or her benefit year, his or her basic weekly benefit amount, and the maximum amount of benefits that may be paid to him or her during the benefit year.

For a claimant who does not meet the wage requirements of § 11-10-507(5), the notice of monetary determination shall include the reason for such determination.

A nonmonetary determination of a claimant's right to waiting period credit or benefits shall be made under §§ 11-10-507 — 11-10-519 promptly upon his or her timely claiming such credit or benefits.

Combination of Claim. Whenever any claim involves the same issue for more than one (1) claimant, the cases will be combined for the purpose of a hearing if a request to do so is received. If the request is made by any interested party, the director shall refer those cases to a hearing examiner designated by the Board of Review.

Finality. The decision shall include the reason for any denial and shall be deemed to be final unless within twenty (20) days after the mailing of notice to an interested party's last known address, or in the absence of mailing, within twenty (20) days after the delivery of notice, an appeal is filed with the board or notice is entered by that body.

Notice of Determinations.

Notice of any monetary determination upon an initial claim shall be promptly given to the claimant, by delivery or by mailing the notice to his or her last known address.

A notice of the filing of an initial claim, together with a request for pertinent information concerning claimant's status, shall be promptly mailed to each employer in the base period other than the employer known to the claimant as his or her last employer if the charges to the base-period employer could be affected by benefits paid.

Notice of a nonmonetary determination made pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be promptly given to the claimant by delivery or by mailing the notice to his or her last known address.

Effective January 1, 1998, a notice of this nonmonetary determination shall be promptly mailed to the last employer.

Monetary Redeterminations.

The director may reconsider a monetary determination when he or she finds that an error in computation or identity has occurred in connection therewith or that base-period wage credits for the claimant had not been used in the original monetary determination.

No reconsideration may be made after one (1) year from the date of the original monetary determination.

If the amount of benefits is increased upon the reconsideration, an appeal solely with respect to the matters involved in the increase may be filed in the manner and subject to the limitations provided in §§ 11-10-523 — 11-10-530.

If the amount of benefits is decreased upon the reconsideration, the matters involved in the decrease shall be subject to review in connection with an appeal by claimant from any determination upon a subsequent claim for benefits that may be affected in amount or duration by the reconsideration.

In the event that an appeal involving an original monetary determination is pending as of the date that a redetermination is issued, the appeal, unless withdrawn, shall be treated as an appeal from such redetermination.

Written notice of a monetary redetermination shall be given in the same manner and to the same parties as provided in subdivision (d)(1) of this section.

Nonmonetary Redeterminations.

Upon receipt of new evidence, the director may reconsider a nonmonetary determination within three (3) years from the date of the original monetary determination.

However, if benefits have been awarded or denied on the basis of a misrepresentation of a material fact, the director may reconsider the nonmonetary determination within one (1) year of the date that the misrepresentation became known to him or her.

In the event that an appeal involving an original nonmonetary determination is pending as of the date that a redetermination is issued, the appeal, unless withdrawn, shall be treated as an appeal from such redetermination.

Written notice of a nonmonetary redetermination shall be given in the same manner and to the same parties as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this section.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1943, No. 138, §§ 1, 2; 1949, No. 155, §§ 6, 7; 1953, No. 162, §§ 4-6; 1963, No. 93, § 7; 1971, No. 35, § 10; 1973, No. 329, § 9; 1975, No. 609, § 3; 1977, No. 366, § 8; 1983, No. 482, § 37; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 29; 1997, No. 234, § 14; 2005, No. 902, § 6; 2007, No. 490, § 7; 2009, No. 653, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 252.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1)(A).